Washington statutes.
RCW 41.08.180

Office and supplies to be furnished—Penalty for not providing.

The duly constituted authorities of each and every city coming within the purview of this chapter, shall provide the commission with suitable and convenient rooms and accommodations and cause the same to be furnished, heated and lighted and supplied with all office supplies and equipment necessary to carry on the business of the commission and with such clerical assistance as may be necessary, all of which is to be commensurate with the number of persons in each such city coming within the purview of this chapter; and the failure upon the part of the duly constituted authorities to do so, shall be considered a violation of this chapter and shall be punishable as such.

[ 1935 c 31 s 19; RRS s 9558-19.]